Colorado statutes. TITLE 26 Human Services Code
ARTICLE 20
PROTECTION OF PERSONS FROM RESTRAINT

Section

26-20-101. Short title.

The short title of this article is the "Protection of Individuals from Restraint and Seclusion Act".

Source:

L. 99:

Entire article added, p. 377, § 1, effective April 22.

L. 2016:

Entire section amended, (HB 16-1328), ch. 345, p. 1400, § 1, effective June 10.

26-20-102. Definitions.

As used in this article 20, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Agency" means:

Any one of the principal departments of state government created in article 1 of title 24, C.R.S., or any division, section, unit, office, or agency within one of such principal departments of state government, except as excluded in paragraph (b) of this subsection (1);

Any county, city and county, municipality, or other political subdivision of the state or any department, division, section, unit, office, or agency of such county, city and county, municipality, or other political subdivision of the state;

Any public or private entity that has entered into a contract for services with an entity described in subsection (1)(a)(I), (1)(a)(II), or (1)(a)(VI) of this section;

Any public or private entity licensed or certified by one of the entities described in subparagraph (I) or (II) of this paragraph (a);

A person regulated pursuant to article 245 of title 12;

Any school district, including any school or charter school of a school district, and the state charter school institute established in section 22-30.5-503, including any institute charter school.

"Agency" does not include:

The department of corrections or any public or private entity that has entered into a contract for services with such department;

Any law enforcement agency of the state or of a political subdivision of the state;

A juvenile probation department or division authorized pursuant to section 19-2.5-1406;

Any county department of human or social services when engaged in performance of duties pursuant to part 3 of article 3 of title 19.

"Chemical restraint" means giving an individual medication involuntarily for the purpose of restraining that individual; except that "chemical restraint" does not include the involuntary administration of medication pursuant to section 27-65-111 (5), C.R.S., or administration of medication for voluntary or life-saving medical procedures.

(2.5) "Division of youth services" means the division of youth services within the state department created pursuant to section 19-2.5-1501.

"Emergency" means a serious, probable, imminent threat of bodily harm to self or others where there is the present ability to effect such bodily harm.

(3.5) "Individual" encompasses both adults and youths, unless the context specifically states one or the other.

"Mechanical restraint" means a physical device used to involuntarily restrict the movement of an individual or the movement or normal function of a portion of his or her body.

"Physical restraint" means the use of bodily, physical force to involuntarily limit an individual's freedom of movement for more than one minute; except that "physical restraint" does not include the holding of a child by one adult for the purposes of calming or comforting the child.

(5.3) "Prone position" means a face-down position.

(5.5) "Prone restraint" means a restraint in which the individual who is being restrained is secured in a prone position.

(5.7) "Qualified mental health professional" means an individual who is a licensed psychologist, a licensed psychiatrist, a licensed clinical social worker, a psychologist candidate for licensure, a licensed marriage and family therapist, or a masters-level mental health therapist who is under the supervision of a licensed mental health professional.

"Restraint" means any method or device used to involuntarily limit freedom of movement, including bodily physical force, mechanical devices, or chemicals. Restraint must not be used as a form of discipline or to gain compliance from a student. If property damage might be involved, restraint may only be used when the destruction of property could possibly result in bodily harm to the individual or another person. "Restraint" includes chemical restraint, mechanical restraint, and physical restraint. "Restraint" does not include:

The use of any form of restraint in a licensed or certified hospital when such use:

Is in the context of providing medical or dental services that are provided with the consent of the individual or the individual's guardian; and

Is in compliance with industry standards adopted by a nationally recognized accrediting body or the conditions of participation adopted for federal medicare and medicaid programs;

The use of protective devices or adaptive devices for providing physical support, prevention of injury, or voluntary or life-saving medical procedures;

The holding of an individual for less than one minute by a staff person for protection of the individual or other persons; except that nothing in this subsection (6)(c) may be interpreted to permit the holding of a public school student in a prone position, except as described in section 26-20-111 (2), (3), or (4); or

Placement of an inpatient or resident in his or her room for the night.

Repealed.

"Seclusion" means the placement of an individual alone in a room or area from which egress is involuntarily prevented, except during normal sleeping hours.

"State department" means the state department of human services.

"Youth" means an individual who is less than twenty-one years of age.

Source:

L. 99:

Entire article added, p. 377, § 1, effective April 22.

L. 2004:

(1)(a)(V) added, p. 920, § 28, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

(2) amended, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 805, § 79, effective April 29.

L. 2016:

(2.5), (3.5), (5.7), (8), and (9) added, IP(6), (6)(c), (6)(d), and (7) amended, and (6)(e) repealed, (HB 16-1328), ch. 345, p. 1400, § 2, effective June 10.

L. 2017:

IP and (2.5) amended (HB 17-1329), ch. 381, p. 1983, § 61, effective June 6; IP, (1)(a)(II), (1)(a)(III), and (6)(c) amended and (1)(a)(VI), (5.3), and (5.5) added, (HB 17-1276), ch. 270, p. 1487, § 3, effective August 9.

L. 2018:

(1)(b)(IV) amended, (SB 18-092), ch. 38, p. 452, § 138, effective August 8.

L. 2019:

(1)(a)(V) amended, (HB 19-1172), ch. 136, p. 1712, § 196, effective October 1.

L. 2021:

(1)(b)(III) and (2.5) amended, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 749, § 130, effective October 1.

L. 2022:

(5), IP(6), and (6)(c) amended, (HB 22-1376), ch. 243, p. 1805, § 8, effective May 26.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 17-1276, see section 1 of chapter 270, Session Laws of Colorado 2017. For the legislative declaration in SB 18-092, see section 1 of chapter 38, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

26-20-103. Basis for use of restraint or seclusion.

Subject to the provisions of this article, an agency may only use restraint or seclusion on an individual:

In cases of emergency, as defined in section 26-20-102 (3); and

After the failure of less restrictive alternatives; or

After a determination that such alternatives would be inappropriate or ineffective under the circumstances.

(1.5) Restraint and seclusion must never be used:

As a punishment or disciplinary sanction;

As part of a treatment plan or behavior modification plan;

For the purpose of retaliation by staff; or

For the purpose of protection, unless:

The restraint or seclusion is ordered by the court; or

In an emergency, as provided for in subsection (1) of this section.

An agency that uses restraint or seclusion pursuant to the provisions of subsection (1) of this section shall use such restraint or seclusion:

Only for the purpose of preventing the continuation or renewal of an emergency;

Only for the period of time necessary to accomplish its purpose; and

In the case of physical restraint, only if no more force than is necessary to limit the individual's freedom of movement is used.

In addition to the circumstances described in subsection (1) of this section, a facility, as defined in section 27-65-102, that is designated by the commissioner of the behavioral health administration in the state department to provide treatment pursuant to section 27-65-106, 27-65-108, 27-65-109, or 27-65-110 to an individual with a mental health disorder, as defined in section 27-65-102, may use seclusion to restrain an individual with a mental health disorder when the seclusion is necessary to eliminate a continuous and serious disruption of the treatment environment.

The general assembly recognizes that skilled nursing and nursing care facilities that participate in federal medicaid programs are subject to federal statutes and regulations concerning the use of restraint in such facilities that afford protections from restraint in a manner consistent with the purposes and policies set forth in this article.

If the use of restraint or seclusion in skilled nursing and nursing care facilities licensed under state law is in accordance with the federal statutes and regulations governing the medicare program set forth in 42 U.S.C. sec. 1395i-3(c) and 42 CFR part 483, subpart B and the medicaid program set forth in 42 U.S.C. sec. 1396r(c) and 42 CFR part 483, subpart B and with the rules of the department of public health and environment relating to the licensing of these facilities, there is a conclusive presumption that use of restraint or seclusion is in accordance with the provisions of this article.

The general assembly recognizes that article 10.5 of title 27, C.R.S., and article 10 of title 25.5, C.R.S., and the rules promulgated pursuant to the authorities set forth in those articles, address the use of restraint on an individual with a developmental disability.

If any provision of this article concerning the use of restraint or seclusion conflicts with any provision concerning the use of restraint or seclusion stated in article 10.5 of title 27, C.R.S., article 10 of title 25.5, C.R.S., or any rule adopted pursuant thereto, the provision of article 10.5 of title 27, C.R.S., article 10 of title 25.5, C.R.S., or the rule adopted pursuant thereto prevails.

The provisions of this article do not apply to any agency engaged in transporting an individual from one facility or location to another facility or location when it is within the scope of that agency's powers and authority to effect such transportation.

Source:

L. 99:

Entire article added, p. 379, § 1, effective April 22.

L. 2006:

(3) amended, p. 1389, § 20, effective August 7.

L. 2010:

(3) amended, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 805, § 80, effective April 29.

L. 2016:

Entire section amended, (HB 16-1328), ch. 345, p. 1401, § 3, effective June 10.

L. 2017:

(3) amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1334, § 224, effective May 25.

L. 2022:

(3) amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1519, § 85, effective July 1; (3) amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1601, § 250 effective August 10; (3) amended, (HB 22-1256), ch. 451, p. 3239, § 54, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

Section 263(3) of chapter 222 (HB 22-1278), Session Laws of Colorado 2022, provides that the act changing this section takes effect only if HB 22-1256 (chapter 451) becomes law and takes effect either on July 1, 2022, or upon the effective date of HB 22-1256, whichever is later. HB 22-1256 became law and took effect August 10, 2022.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 17-242, see section 1 of chapter 263, Session Laws of Colorado 2017.

26-20-104. General duties relating to use of restraint on individuals.

Notwithstanding the provisions of section 26-20-103, an agency that uses restraint shall ensure that:

At least every fifteen minutes, staff shall monitor any individual held in mechanical restraints to assure that the individual is properly positioned, that the individual's blood circulation is not restricted, that the individual's airway is not obstructed, and that the individual's other physical needs are met;

No physical or mechanical restraint of an individual shall place excess pressure on the chest or back of that individual or inhibit or impede the individual's ability to breathe;

During physical restraint of an individual, an agent or employee of the agency shall check to ensure that the breathing of the individual in such physical restraint is not compromised;

A chemical restraint shall be given only on the order of a physician or an advanced practice registered nurse with prescriptive authority who has determined, either while present during the course of the emergency justifying the use of the chemical restraint or after telephone consultation with a registered nurse, licensed physician assistant, or other authorized staff person who is present at the time and site of the emergency and who has participated in the evaluation of the individual, that such form of restraint is the least restrictive, most appropriate alternative available. Nothing in this subsection (1) shall modify the requirements of section 26-20-102 (2) or 26-20-103 (3).

An order for a chemical restraint, along with the reasons for its issuance, shall be recorded in writing at the time of its issuance;

An order for a chemical restraint shall be signed at the time of its issuance by such physician if present at the time of the emergency;

An order for a chemical restraint, if authorized by telephone, shall be transcribed and signed at the time of its issuance by an individual with the authority to accept telephone medication orders who is present at the time of the emergency;

Staff trained in the administration of medication shall make notations in the record of the individual as to the effect of the chemical restraint and the individual's response to the chemical restraint.

For individuals in mechanical restraints, agency staff shall provide relief periods, except when the individual is sleeping, of at least ten minutes as often as every two hours, so long as relief from the mechanical restraint is determined to be safe. During such relief periods, the staff shall ensure proper positioning of the individual and provide movement of limbs, as necessary. In addition, during such relief periods, staff shall provide assistance for use of appropriate toiletting methods, as necessary. The individual's dignity and safety shall be maintained during relief periods. Staff shall note in the record of the individual being restrained the relief periods granted.

Relief periods from seclusion shall be provided for reasonable access to toilet facilities.

An individual in physical restraint shall be released from such restraint within fifteen minutes after the initiation of physical restraint, except when precluded for safety reasons.

Source:

L. 99:

Entire article added, p. 380, § 1, effective April 22.

L. 2001:

(1)(d) amended, p. 185, § 18, effective August 8.

L. 2008:

(1)(d) amended, p. 135, § 26, effective January 1, 2009.

26-20-104.5. Duties relating to use of seclusion by division of youth services.

Notwithstanding the provisions of section 26-20-103 to the contrary, if the division of youth services holds a youth in seclusion in any secure state-operated or state-owned facility:

A staff member shall check the youth's safety at varying intervals, but at least every fifteen minutes;

Within one hour after the beginning of the youth's seclusion period, and every hour thereafter, a staff member shall notify the facility director or his or her designee of the seclusion and receive his or her written approval of the seclusion; and

Within twelve hours after the beginning of the youth's seclusion period, the division of youth services shall notify the youth's parent, guardian, or legal custodian and inform that person that the youth is or was in seclusion and the reason for his or her seclusion.

A youth placed in seclusion because of an ongoing emergency must not be held in seclusion beyond four consecutive hours, unless the requirements of paragraph (b) of this subsection (2) are satisfied.

If an emergency situation occurs that continues beyond four consecutive hours, the division of youth services may not continue the use of seclusion for that youth unless the following criteria are met and documented:

A qualified mental health professional, or, if such professional is not available, the facility director or his or her designee, determines that referral of the youth in seclusion to a mental health facility is not warranted; and

The director of the division of youth services, or his or her designee, approves at or before the conclusion of four hours, and every hour thereafter, the continued use of seclusion.

A youth may not be held in seclusion under any circumstances for more than eight total hours in two consecutive calendar days without a written court order.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the division of youth services may place a youth alone in a room or area from which egress is involuntarily prevented if such confinement is part of a routine practice that is applicable to substantial portions of the population. Such confinement must be imposed only for the completion of administrative tasks and should last no longer than necessary to achieve the task safely and effectively.

Source:

L. 2016:

Entire section added, (HB 16-1328), ch. 345, p. 1403, § 4, effective June 10.

L. 2017:

IP(1), (1)(c), IP(2)(b), (2)(b)(II), and (3) amended, (HB 17-1329), ch. 381, p. 1983, § 62, effective June 6.

26-20-105. Staff training concerning the use of restraint and seclusion - adults and youth.

An agency that utilizes restraint or seclusion shall ensure that all staff involved in utilizing restraint or seclusion in its facilities or programs are trained in the appropriate use of restraint and seclusion.

(1.5) The division of youth services shall ensure that all staff involved in utilizing restraint and seclusion are trained in:

The health and behavioral effects of restraint and seclusion on youth, including those with behavioral or mental health disorders or intellectual and developmental disabilities;

Effective de-escalation techniques for youth in crisis, including those with behavioral or mental health disorders or intellectual and developmental disabilities;

The value of positive over negative reinforcement in dealing with youth; and

Methods for implementing positive behavior incentives.

All agencies that utilize restraint or seclusion shall ensure that staff are trained to explain, where possible, the use of restraint or seclusion to the individual who is to be restrained or secluded and to the individual's family if appropriate.

Source:

L. 99:

Entire article added, p. 381, § 1, effective April 22.

L. 2016:

Entire section amended, (HB 16-1328), ch. 345, p. 1404, § 5, effective June 10.

L. 2017:

(1.5)(a) and (1.5)(b) amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1335, § 225, effective May 25; IP(1.5) amended, (HB 17-1329), ch. 381, p. 1984, § 63, effective June 6.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 17-242, see section 1 of chapter 263, Session Laws of Colorado 2017.

26-20-106. Documentation requirements for restraint and seclusion - adults and youth.

Each agency shall ensure that the use of restraint or seclusion is documented in the record of the individual who was restrained or secluded. Each agency that is authorized to promulgate rules or adopt ordinances shall promulgate rules or adopt ordinances applicable to the agencies within their respective jurisdictions specifying the documentation requirements for purposes of this section.

The division of youth services shall maintain the following documentation each time a youth is placed in seclusion as a result of an emergency in any secure state-operated or state-owned facility:

The date of the occurrence;

The race, age, and gender of the individual;

The reason or reasons for seclusion, including a description of the emergency and the specific facts that demonstrate that the youth posed a serious, probable, and imminent threat of bodily harm to himself, herself, or others, and that there was a present ability to effect such bodily harm;

A description of de-escalation measures taken by staff and the response, if any, of the youth in seclusion to those measures;

An explanation of why less restrictive alternatives were unsuccessful;

The total time in seclusion;

Any incidents of self-harm or suicide that occurred while the youth was in seclusion;

With respect to the interactions required by section 26-20-104.5, documentation of the justification for keeping the youth in seclusion and specific facts to demonstrate that the emergency was ongoing;

The facility director or his or her designee's approval of continued seclusion at intervals as required by section 26-20-104.5;

Documentation of notification within twelve hours to the parent, guardian, or legal custodian of the youth in seclusion as required by section 26-20-104.5; and

The written approval by the director of the division of youth services for any seclusion that results from an emergency that extends beyond four consecutive hours, as required by section 26-20-104.5. This written approval must include documentation of specific facts to demonstrate that the emergency was ongoing and specific reasons why a referral to a mental health facility was not warranted.

The division of youth services shall maintain the following documentation each time one or more youths are placed in confinement for administrative reasons pursuant to section 26-20-104.5 (3) in a secure state-operated or state-owned facility:

The number of youth confined;

The length of time the youth or youths were confined; and

The reason or reasons for the confinement.

On or before January 1, 2017, and on or before July 1, 2017, and every January 1 and July 1 thereafter, the division of youth services shall report on its use of restraint or seclusion in any secure state-operated or state-owned facility to the youth restraint and seclusion working group established in section 26-20-110. The January report must include information from March 1 through August 31, and the July report must include information from September 1 through the last day of February. The reports must include the following:

An incident report on any use of seclusion on a youth due to an emergency for more than four consecutive hours, or for more than eight total hours in two consecutive calendar days. Each incident report must include length of seclusion, specific facts that demonstrate that the emergency was ongoing, any incidents of self-harm while in seclusion, the reasons why attempts to process the youth out of seclusion were unsuccessful, and any corrective measures taken to prevent lengthy or repeat periods of seclusion in the future. To protect the privacy of the youth, the division of youth services shall redact all private medical or mental health information and personal identifying information, including, if necessary, the facility at which the seclusion occurred.

A report that lists the following aggregate information, both as combined totals and totals by facility for all secure state-operated or state-owned facilities:

The total number of youths held in seclusion or restraint due to an emergency;

The total number of incidents of seclusion or restraint due to an emergency;

The average time in seclusion or restraint per incident;

An aggregate summary of race, age, and gender of youths held in seclusion or restraint; and

The type of restraint or restraints used in each incident; and

An incident report for any youth whom the division isolates from his or her peers for more than eight hours in two consecutive calendar days. Each incident report must include the age, race, and gender of the youth; the name of the facility; the length of time that the youth was isolated from his or her peers; and the justification for the isolation on an hour-by-hour basis. To protect the privacy of the youth, the division shall redact all private medical or mental health information and personal identifying information, including, if necessary, the facility at which the seclusion occurred. If the division has prepared an incident report of an incident involving seclusion pursuant to subsection (4)(a) of this section, the division is not required to include a report of the same incident pursuant to this subsection (4)(c).

Reports prepared pursuant to this section must maintain the confidentiality of all youth. The reports made pursuant to this section are available to the public upon request.

Prior to January 1, 2018, the division of youth services shall meet the requirements of this section to the extent that it is able using its current reporting mechanisms. The division of youth services shall fully comply with all requirements of this section on or before January 1, 2018.

Source:

L. 99:

Entire article added, p. 382, § 1, effective April 22.

L. 2016:

Entire section amended, (HB 16-1328), ch. 345, p. 1404, § 6, effective June 10.

L. 2017:

IP(2), (2)(k), IP(3), (4), and (6) amended, (HB 17-1329), ch. 381, p. 1962, § 4, effective June 6.

26-20-107. Review of the use of restraint and seclusion.

An agency that utilizes restraint or seclusion shall ensure that a review process is established for the appropriate use of restraint or seclusion.

Source:

L. 99:

Entire article added, p. 382, § 1, effective April 22.

L. 2016:

Entire section amended, (HB 16-1328), ch. 345, p. 1406, § 7, effective June 10.

26-20-108. Rules.

An agency that is authorized to promulgate rules or adopt ordinances shall promulgate rules or adopt ordinances applicable to the agencies within their respective jurisdictions that establish procedures for the use of restraint and seclusion consistent with the provisions of this article. Any agency that has rules or ordinances in existence on April 22, 1999, is not required to promulgate additional rules or adopt additional ordinances unless that agency's existing rules or ordinances do not meet the minimum requirements of this article.

Source:

L. 99:

Entire article added, p. 382, § 1, effective April 22.

L. 2016:

Entire section amended, (HB 16-1328), ch. 345, p. 1406, § 8, effective June 10.

26-20-109. Limitations.

Nothing in this article shall be deemed to form an independent basis of statutory authority for the use of restraint.

Nothing in this article shall be deemed to authorize an agency to implement policies, procedures, or standards or promulgate rules or adopt ordinances that would limit, decrease, or adversely impact any policies, procedures, standards, rules, or ordinances in effect on April 22, 1999, that provided greater protection concerning the use of restraint than is set forth in this article.

Source:

L. 99:

Entire article added, p. 382, § 1, effective April 22.

26-20-110. Youth restraint and seclusion working group - membership - purpose - repeal.

There is established within the division of youth services a youth restraint and seclusion working group, referred to in this section as the "working group". The working group consists of:

The director of the office of children, youth, and families in the division of child welfare within the state department, or his or her designee. The director shall convene the working group and serve as chair.

The director of the division of youth services, or his or her designee;

The director of behavioral health within the division of youth services, or his or her designee;

The commissioner of the behavioral health administration in the state department, or the commissioner's designee;

An employee of the division of youth services who is a representative of an organization in Colorado that exists for the purpose of dealing with the state as an employer concerning issues of mutual concern between employees and the state, as appointed by the governor;

Two representatives from nonprofit advocacy groups that work to restrict restraint or seclusion for youth or that represent children within the custody of the division of youth services, one who is appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives and one who is appointed by the president of the senate;

Two experts independent from the division of youth services with expertise in adolescent development, adolescent brain development, trauma-responsive care of juveniles, positive behavior incentives in a juvenile correctional setting, evidence-based de-escalation techniques, or the negative effects of seclusion on the adolescent brain. The minority leader of the house of representatives shall appoint one expert and the minority leader of the senate shall appoint the other expert.

A person who does not work for the department or for the division of youth services and who has worked as a staff member or as a senior executive in youth corrections and who has experience working to establish a rehabilitative and therapeutic culture in one or more juvenile justice facilities, to be appointed by the governor or his or her designee.

The child protection ombudsman or his or her designee pursuant to section 19-3.3-103 (1)(g); and

A parent of a person who was once committed to the custody of the division of youth services, to be appointed by the state public defender.

The working group shall advise the division of youth services concerning policies, procedures, and best practices related to restraint and seclusion and alternatives to restraint and seclusion.

The working group shall monitor the division of youth services' use of confinement for administrative purposes. The division of youth services shall share with the working group, on an ongoing basis, available data regarding time spent in confinement by youths for administrative reasons, as described in section 26-20-104.5 (3), in any secure state-operated and state-owned facility. If necessary, the working group may make recommendations to the division of youth services and to the public health care and human services committee of the house of representatives and the health and human services committee of the senate, or any successor committees, about the use of confinement for administrative purposes.

The working group may request, on a semiannual basis, information and data from the state department on the status of the division of youth services' work related to the restraint and seclusion of youths in their care and custody.

The chair of the working group shall convene the working group's first meeting no later than August 1, 2016. The working group must meet at least semi-annually thereafter. The chair shall schedule and convene subsequent meetings.

The chair shall provide the working group with semiannual updates on the division of youth services' policies related to restraint and seclusion and alternatives to restraint and seclusion.

This section is repealed, effective September 1, 2024.

Prior to the repeal, the working group shall be reviewed as provided in section 2-3-1203, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 2016:

Entire section added, (HB 16-1328), ch. 345, p. 1407, § 9, effective June 10.

L. 2017:

(1), (2), (3), (4), and (6) amended, (HB 17-1329), ch. 381, p. 1964, § 5, effective June 6.

L. 2018:

(1)(g) amended and (1)(i) and (1)(j) added, (HB 18-1010), ch. 25, p. 283, § 3, effective March 7.

L. 2022:

(1)(d) amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1519, § 86, effective July 1.

26-20-111. Use of restraints in public schools - certain restraints prohibited.

Except as provided otherwise in this section, and notwithstanding any other provision of this article 20:

The use of a chemical, mechanical, or prone restraint upon a student of a school of a school district, charter school of a school district, or institute charter school is prohibited when the student is on the property of any agency or is participating in an off-campus, school-sponsored activity or event; and

A school resource officer or a law enforcement officer acting in the officer's official capacity on school grounds, in a school vehicle, or at a school activity or sanctioned event shall not use handcuffs on any student, unless there is a danger to themselves or others or handcuffs are used during a custodial arrest that requires transport.

The prohibition described in subsection (1) of this section does not apply to the use of mechanical or prone restraints on a student of a school of a school district, charter school of a school district, or institute charter school who is openly displaying a deadly weapon, as defined in section 18-1-901 (3)(e).

The prohibition described in subsection (1) of this section does not apply to the use of mechanical or prone restraints by an armed security officer or a certified peace officer working in a school of a school district, charter school of a school district, or institute charter school when the officer:

Has received documented training in defensive tactics utilizing handcuffing procedures;

Has received documented training in restraint tactics utilizing prone holds; and

Has made a referral to a law enforcement agency.

The prohibition described in subsection (1) of this section does not apply to schools operated in state-owned facilities within the division of youth services.

If a school district, charter school of a school district, or institute charter school uses a seclusion room, there must be at least one window for monitoring when the door is closed. If a window is not feasible, monitoring must be possible through a video camera. A student placed in a seclusion room must be continually monitored. The room must be a safe space free of injurious items. The seclusion room must not be a room that is used by school staff for storage, custodial, or office space.

Nothing in this section prohibits school personnel from taking any lawful actions necessary, including seclusion or restraint, when and where necessary to keep students and staff safe from harm during an emergency, as defined by rule of the state board. School personnel shall comply with all documentation and reporting requirements, even in the case of an emergency.

If a physical restraint is between one and five minutes, the notification requirement must be a written notice to the parent on the day of the restraint. The notice must include the date, the student's name, and the number of restraints that day that lasted between one and five minutes.

On or before July 1, 2023, the state board shall initiate rule making for the process of determining whether to require the reporting of restraints from one to five minutes and what data, if any, will be collected. As a part of the public input process required pursuant to section 24-4-104, the state board and the department of education shall engage with stakeholders, including, but not limited to, a representative of school district administrators, a statewide organization representing special education directors, and a member of a disability rights organization.

Statutory provisions concerning the use of restraints in school districts, charter schools of a school district, or institute charter schools, including reporting requirements, are set forth in sections 22-30.5-528 and 22-32-147.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire section added, (HB 17-1276), ch. 270, p. 1487, § 2, effective August 9.

L. 2022:

(1) amended and (5), (6), (7), (8), and (9) added, (HB 22-1376), ch. 243, p. 1805, § 9, effective May 26.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 17-1276, see section 1 of chapter 270, Session Laws of Colorado 2017.